Missouri, session 2026, SB836.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Sections 115.125, 115.127, 115.233, 115.277,
2
115.284, 115.427, 115.430, and 115.453, RSMo, are repealed and
3
eight new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
4
sections 115.125, 115.127, 115.233, 115.277, 115.284, 115.427,
5
115.430, and 115.453, to read as follows:
1
115.125. 1. Not later than 5:00 p.m. on the tenth
2
Tuesday prior to a ny election, except a special election to
3
decide an election contest, tie vote or an election to elect
4
seven members to serve on a school board of a district
5
pursuant to section 162.241, or a delay in notification
6
pursuant to subsection [3] 2 of this section, or pursuant to
7
the provisions of section 115.399, the officer or agency
8
calling the election shall notify the election authorities
9
responsible for conducting the election. The notice shall
10
be in writing, shall specify the name of the officer or
11
agency calling the election and shall include a certified
12
copy of the legal notice to be published pursuant to
13
subsection 2 of section 115.127. The notice and any other
14
information required by this sect ion may, with the prior
15
notification to the election authority receiving the notice,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS SB 836 2
16
be accepted by email or facsimile transmission prior to 5:00
17
p.m. on the tenth Tuesday prior to the election[, provided
18
that the original copy of the notice and a certified copy of
19
the legal notice to be published shall be received in the
20
office of the election authority within three business days
21
from the date of the facsimile transmission.
22
2. In lieu of a certified copy of the legal notice to
23
be publ i shed pursuant to subsection 2 of section 115.127,
24
each notice of a special election to fill a vacancy shall
25
include the name of the office to be filled, the date of the
26
election and the date by which candidates must be selected
27
or filed for the office. Not later than the sixth Tuesday
28
prior to any special ele c tion to fill a vacancy called by a
29
political subdivision or special district, the officer or
30
agency calling the election shall certify a sample ballot to
31
the election authorities responsible for conducting the
32
election.
33
3.] 2. Except as provided for in sections 115.247 and
34
115.359, if there is no additional cost for the printing or
35
reprinting of ballots or if the political subdivision or
36
special district calling for the election agrees to pay any
37
printing or reprinting costs, a political subdivision or
38
special district may, at any time after certification of the
39
notice of election required in subsection 1 of this section,
40
but no later than 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Tuesday before the
41
election, be permitted to make late notification to the
42
election authority pursuant to court order, which, except
43
for good cause shown by the election authority in opposition
44
thereto, shall be freely given upon application by the
45
political subdivision or special district to the circuit
46
court of the area of such subdivision or district. No court
47
shall have the authority to order an individual or issue be

SCS SB 836 3
48
placed on the ballot less than eight weeks before the date
49
of the election.
1
115.127. 1. Except as provided in subsection 4 of
2
this section, upo n receipt of notice of a special election
3
to fill a vacancy submitted pursuant to subsection 2 of
4
section 115.125, the election authority shall cause legal
5
notice of the special election to be published in a
6
newspaper of general circulation in its jurisdiction. The
7
notice shall include the name of the officer or agenc y
8
calling the election, the date and time of the election, the
9
name of the office to be filled and the date by which
10
candidates must be selected or filed for the office. Within
11
one week prior to each special election to fill a va c ancy
12
held in its jurisdiction, the election authority shall cause
13
legal notice of the election to be published in two
14
newspapers of different political faith and general
15
circulation in the jurisdiction. The legal notice shall
16
include the date and time of the election, the name of the
17
officer or agency calling the election and a sample ballot.
18
If there is only one newspaper of general circulation in the
19
jurisdiction, the notice shall be published in the newspaper
20
within one week prior to the election. If there are two or
21
more newspapers of general circulation in the jurisdiction,
22
but no two of opposite political faith, the notice shall be
23
published in any two of the newspapers within one week prior
24
to the election.
25
2. Except as provided in subsections 1 and 4 of this
26
section and in sections 115.521, 115.549 and 115.593, the
27
election authority shall cause legal notice of each election
28
held in its jurisdiction to be published. The notice shall
29
be published in two newspapers of differe n t political faith
30
and qualified pursuant to chapter 493 which are published

SCS SB 836 4
31
within the bounds of the area holding the election. If
32
there is only one so-qualified newspaper, then noti c e shall
33
be published in only one newspaper. If there is no
34
newspaper published within the boun d s of the election area,
35
then the notice shall be published in two qualified
36
newspapers of different political faith serving the area.
37
Notice shall be published twice, the first publication
38
occurring in the second week prior to the election, and the
39
second publication occurring within one week prior to the
40
election. Each such legal notice shall include the date and
41
time of t h e election, the name of the officer or agency
42
calling the election and a sample ballot; and, unless notice
43
has been given as provided by section 115.129, the second
44
publication of notice of the election shall include the
45
location of polling places. The election authority may
46
provide any additional noti c e of the election it deems
47
desirable.
48
3. The election authority shall print the official
49
ballot a s the same appears on the sample ballot, and no
50
candidate's name or ballot issue which appears on the sample
51
ballot or official printed ballot shall be stricken or
52
removed from the ballot except on death of a candidate or by
53
court order, but in no event shall a candidate or issue be
54
stricken or removed from the ballot less than eight weeks
55
before the date of the election.
56
4. In lieu of causing legal notice to be published in
57
accorda n ce with any of the provisions of this chapter, the
58
election authority in jurisdictions which have less than
59
seven hundred fifty registered voters and in which no
60
newspaper qualified pursuant to chapter 493 is published,
61
may cause legal notice to be mailed during the second week
62
prior to the election, by first class mail, to each

SCS SB 836 5
63
registered voter at the voter's voting address. All such
64
legal notices shall include the date and time of the
65
election, the location of the polling place, the name of the
66
officer or agency calling the election and a sample ballot.
67
5. If the opening date for filing a declaration of
68
candida c y for any office in a political subdivision or
69
special district is not required by law or charter, the
70
opening filing date shall be 8:00 a.m., the [seventeenth]
71
sixteenth Tuesday prior to the election. If the closing
72
date for filing a declaration of candida c y for any office in
73
a political subdivision or special district is not required
74
by law or charter, the closing filing date shall be 5:00
75
p.m., the [fourteenth] thirteenth Tuesday prior to the
76
election, or if the thirteenth Tuesday prior to the election
77
is a state or federal holiday, the closing filing date shall
78
be 5:00 p.m. on the next day that is not a state or federal
79
holiday. The political subdivision or special district
80
calling a n election shall, before the [seventeenth]
81
sixteenth Tuesday, prior to any election at which offices
82
are to be filled, notify the general public of the opening
83
filing date, the office or offices to be filled, the proper
84
place for filing and the closing filing date of the
85
election. Such notification may be accomplished by legal
86
notice pu b lished in at least one newspaper of general
87
circulation in the political subdivision or special district.
88
6. Except as provided for in sections 115.247 and
89
115.359 , if there is no additional cost for the printing or
90
reprinting of ballots or if the candidate agrees to pay any
91
printing or reprinting costs, a candidate who has filed for
92
an office or who has been duly nominated for an office may,
93
at any time after the certification of the notice of
94
election required in subsection 1 of section 115.125 but no

SCS SB 836 6
95
later than 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Tuesday before the
96
election, withdraw as a candidate pursuant to a court order,
97
which, except for good cause shown by the election authority
98
in opposition thereto, shall be freely given upon
99
application by the candidate to the circuit court of the
100
area of such candidate's residence.
1
115.233. [Within] At least fourteen days prior to an
2
election and n o less than one week prior to an election at
3
which an electronic voting system is to be used, the
4
election authority shall have the automatic tabulating
5
equipment tested to ascertain that the equipment is in
6
compliance with the law and that it will correctly count the
7
votes cast for all offices and on all questions. At least
8
forty-eight hours prior to the test, notice of t h e time and
9
place of the test shall be mailed to each independent and
10
new party candidate and the chairman of the county committee
11
of each established political party named on the ballot.
12
The test shall be observed by at least two persons
13
designated by the election authority, one from each major
14
political party, and shall be open to representatives of the
15
political parties, candidates, the news media and the
16
public. The test shall be conducted by processing a
17
preaudi t ed group of ballots. If any error is detected, the
18
cause shall be ascertained a n d corrected, and an errorless
19
count shall be made before the tabulating equipment is
20
approved.
1
115.277. 1. A registered voter of this state may cast
2
an absentee b a llo t in person at a location designated by the
3
election authority for all candidates and issues for which
4
such voter is eligible to vote at the polling place if such
5
voter expects to be prevented from going to the polls to
6
vote on election day due to one of the reasons listed in

SCS SB 836 7
7
subsection 3 of this section. A registered voter casting a
8
ballot under the provisions o f this subsection shall provide
9
a form of personal photo identification that is consistent
10
with subsection 1 of section 115.427. Beginning on the
11
second Tuesday prior to an election, a reason listed under
12
subsection 3 of this section shall not be required, provided
13
that, the provisions of section 1.140 to the contrary
14
notwithstanding, this sentence and section 115.427 shall be
15
nonseverable, and if any provision of section 115.427 is for
16
any reason held to be invalid, such decision shall
17
invalidate this sentence.
18
2. Except as provided in subsections 4, 5, and 6 of
19
this se c tion, a registered voter of this state may cast an
20
absentee ballot not in person at a location designated by
21
the election authority for all candidates and issues for
22
which such voter would be eligible to vote at the polling
23
place if such voter expects to be prevented from going to
24
the polls to vote on election day due to one of the reasons
25
listed in subsection 3 of this section. An absentee ballot
26
that is not requested and completed in p erson at the office
27
of the election authority with a form of personal photo
28
identification that is consistent with subsection 1 of
29
section 115.427 shall have the statement on the ballot
30
envelope notarized as required under section 115.283, except
31
that absentee ballots requested under subdivisions (2) and
32
(5) of subsection 3 of this section shall not require
33
notarization. This subsection shall apply only in the case
34
of absentee b a llots that are not cast in person.
35
3. A voter may request an absentee ballot for any of
36
the fol l owing reasons:

SCS SB 836 8
37
(1) Absence on election day from the jurisdiction of
38
the elec t ion authority in which such voter is registered to
39
vote;
40
(2) Incapacity or confinement due to illness or
41
physical disability on election day, including a person who
42
is primarily responsible for the physical care of a person
43
who is incapacitated or confined due to illness or
44
disability and resides at the same address;
45
(3) Religious belief or practice;
46
(4) Employment as:
47
(a) An election authority, as a member of an election
48
authorit y , or by an election authority at a location other
49
than such voter's polling place;
50
(b) A first responder;
51
(c) A health care worker; or
52
(d) A member of law enforcement;
53
(5) Incarceration, provided all qualifications for
54
voting a r e retained;
55
(6) Certified participation in the address
56
confiden t iality program established under sections 589.660
57
to 589.681 because of safety concerns.
58
4. Any covered voter who is eligible to register and
59
vote in this state may vote in any election for federal
60
office, statewide office, state legislative office, or
61
statewide ballot initiatives by submitting a federal
62
postcard application to apply to vote by absentee ballot or
63
by submitting a federal postcard application at the [polling
64
place] office of the election authority on election day,
65
even though the person is not registered. A federal
66
postcard application submitted by a cover e d voter pursuant
67
to this subsection shall also serve as a voter registration
68
application under section 115.908 and the election authority

SCS SB 836 9
69
shall, if satisfied that the applicant is entitled to
70
register, place the voter's name on the voter registration
71
file. Each covered voter may vote by absentee ballot or,
72
upon s ubmitting an affidavit that the person is qualified to
73
vote in the election, may vote at the person's polling place.
74
5. Any interstate former resident may vote by absentee
75
ballot o r at the office of the election authority on
76
election day for presidential and vice presidential electors.
77
6. Any new resident may vote by absentee ballot or at
78
the off i ce of the election authority on election day for
79
presidential and vice presidential electors after
80
registering to vote in such resident's new jurisdiction of
81
residence.
1
115.284. 1. There is hereby established an absentee
2
voting proces s to assist persons with permanent disabilities
3
in the exercise of their voting rights.
4
2. The local election authority shall send an
5
applica t ion to participate in the absentee voting process
6
set out in this section to any registered voter residing
7
within the election authority's jurisdiction upon request.
8
3. Upon receipt of a properly completed application,
9
the ele c tion authority shall enter the voter's name on a
10
list of voters qualified to participate as absentee voters
11
pursuant to this section.
12
4. The application to participate in the absentee
13
voting p rocess shall be in substantially the following form:
14
State of _________
15
County (City) of _________
16
I, _________(print applicant's name), declare
17
that I am a resident and registered voter of

SCS SB 836 10
18
_________County, Missouri, and am permanently
19
disabled. I hereby request that my name be placed
20
on the election authority's list of voters
21
qualified to participate as absentee voters
22
pursuant to section 115.284, and that I be
23
delivered an absentee ballot application for each
24
election in which I am eligible to vote.
25
_____________________
26
Signature of Voter
27
_____________________
28
_____________________
29
Voter's Address
30
5. Not earlier than ten weeks before an election but
31
prior t o the fourth Tuesday prior to an election, the
32
election authority shall deliver to each voter qualified to
33
participate as absentee voters pursuant to this section an
34
absentee ballot application if the voter is eligible to vote
35
in that election. If the voter returns the absentee request
36
application to the election authority not later than 5:00
37
p.m. on the second Wednesday before an election and has
38
retained the necessary qualifications to vote, the election
39
authority shall provide the voter with an absentee ballot
40
pursuant to this chapter.
41
6. The election authority shall remove from the list
42
of vote r s qualified to participate as absentee voters
43
pursuant to this section any voter who:
44
(1) Asks to be removed from the list;
45
(2) Dies;
46
(3) Becomes disqualified from voting pursuant to this
47
chapter; or
48
(4) No longer resides at the address of his or her
49
voter re g istration.

SCS SB 836 11
50
7. All lists of applications under this section shall
51
be kept confidential.
1
115.427. 1. Persons seeking to vote in a public
2
election shal l es t ablish their identity and eligibility to
3
vote at the polling place or, if voting absentee in person
4
under section 115.277, at the office of the election
5
authority or other authorized location designated by the
6
election authority by presenting a form of personal photo
7
identification to election officials. No form of personal
8
photo identification other than the f o rms listed in this
9
section shall be accepted to establish a voter's
10
qualifications to vote. Forms of personal photo
11
identification that sat i sfy the requirements of this section
12
are any one of the following:
13
(1) Nonexpired Missouri driver's license;
14
(2) Nonexpired or nonexpiring Missouri nondriver's
15
license;
16
(3) A document that satisfies all of the following
17
requirem e nts:
18
(a) The document contains the name of the individual
19
to whom t he document was issued, and the name substantially
20
conforms to the most recent signature in the individual's
21
voter registration record;
22
(b) The document shows a photograph of the individual;
23
(c) The document includes an expiration date, and the
24
document is not expired, or, if expired, the document
25
expired after the date of the most recent general election;
26
and
27
(d) The document was issued by the United States or
28
the stat e of Missouri; or
29
(4) Any identification containing a photograph of the
30
individu a l which is issued by the Missouri National Guard,

SCS SB 836 12
31
the United States Armed Forces, including the Space Force,
32
or the United States Department of Veteran Affairs to a
33
member or former member of the Missouri National Guard or
34
the United States Armed Forces, including the Space Force,
35
and that is not expired or does not have an expiration date.
36
2. (1) An individual who appears at a polling place
37
or, if v otin g absentee in person pursuant to section
38
115.277, at the office of the election authority or other
39
authorized location designated by the election authority,
40
without a form of personal identification described in
41
subsection 1 of this section and who is otherwise qualified
42
to vote at that [polling place] location shall be allowed to
43
cast a provisional ballot. The election judges or election
44
authority shall make a not a tion on the provisional ballot
45
envelope to indicate that the voter's identity was not
46
verified.
47
(2) No person shall be entitled to receive a
48
provisio n al ballot until such person has completed a
49
provisional ballot affidavit on the provisional ballot
50
envelope. All provisional ballots shall be marked with a
51
conspicuo u s stamp or mark that makes them distinguishable
52
from other ballots.
53
(3) The provisional ballot envelope shall be completed
54
by the v o ter for use in determining the voter's eligibility
55
to cast a ballot.
56
3. The provisional ballot envelope shall provide a
57
place f o r the voter's name, address, date of birth, and last
58
four digits of his or her Social Security number, followed
59
by a certificate in substantially the following form:

SCS SB 836 13
60
I do solemnly swear that I am the person identified
61
above and the information provided is correct. I
62
understand that my vote will not be counted unless:
63
(1) (a) I return to this polling place today
64
between 6:00 a.m. and 7:00 p.m. and provide one of
65
the following forms of identification:
66
a. Nonexpired Missouri driver's license;
67
b. Nonexpired or nonexpiring Missouri nondriver's
68
license;
69
c. A document that satisfies all of the following
70
requirements:
71
(i) The document contains my name, in
72
substantially the same form as the most recent
73
signature on my voter registration record;
74
(ii) The document contains my photograph;
75
(iii) The document contains an expiration date
76
and is not expired, or if expired, the document
77
expired after the date of the most recent general
78
election; and
79
(iv) The document was issued by the United States
80
or the state of Missouri; or
81
d. Identification containing my photograph issued
82
to me by the Missouri National Guard, the United
83
States Armed Forces, including Space Force, or the
84
United States Department of Veteran Affairs as a
85
member or former member of the Missouri National
86
Guard or the United States Armed Forces that is not
87
expired or does not have an expiration date; or
88
(b) The election authority verifies my identity by
89
comparing my signature on this envelope to the
90
signature on file with the election authority and

SCS SB 836 14
91
determines that I was eligible to cast a ballot at
92
this polling place; and
93
(2) This provisional ballot otherwise qualifies to
94
be counted under the laws of the State of Missouri.
95
__________________ ____________________
96
Signature of Voter Date
97
__________________ ____________________
98
Signature of Election Officials
99
Once voted, the provisional ballot shall be sealed in the
100
provisional ballot envelope and placed in a separate secured
101
container by the election judge or election authority.
102
4. The provisional ballot cast by such voter shall not
103
be coun t ed unless:
104
(1) (a) The voter returns to the polling place during
105
the unif o rm p o lling hours established by section 115.407 or,
106
if voting by absentee ballot in person, the voter returns to
107
the election authority's office by 7 p.m. on election day
108
and provides a form of personal identification that allows
109
the election judges to verify the voter's identity as
110
provided in subsection 1 of this section; or
111
(b) The election authority verifies the identity of
112
the indi v idual by comparing that individual's signature to
113
the signature on file with the election authority and
114
determines that the individual was eligible to cast a ballot
115
at the [polling place] location where the ballot was cast;
116
and
117
(2) The provisional ballot otherwise qualifies to be
118
counted u nder section 115.430.

SCS SB 836 15
119
5. The secretary of state shall provide notice of the
120
persona l photo identification requirements described in
121
subsection 1 of this section on the official state internet
122
website of the secretary of state.
123
6. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section
124
136.055 and s ection 302.181 to the contrary, the state and
125
all fee offices shall provide one nondriver's license at no
126
cost to any otherwise qualified voter who does not already
127
possess such identification and who desires the
128
identification for voting.
129
(2) This state and its agencies shall provide one copy
130
of each o f the following, free of charge, if needed by an
131
individual seeking to obtain a form of personal photo
132
identification described in subsection 1 of this section in
133
order to vote:
134
(a) A birth certificate;
135
(b) A marriage license or certificate;
136
(c) A divorce decree;
137
(d) A certificate of decree of adoption;
138
(e) A court order changing the person's name;
139
(f) A Social Security card reflecting an updated name;
140
and
141
(g) Naturalization papers or other documents from the
142
United S t ates Department of State proving citizenship.
143
Any individual seeking one of the above documents in order
144
to obtain a form of personal photo identification described
145
in subsection 1 of this section for voting may request the
146
secretary of state to facilitate the acquisition of such
147
documents. The secretary of state shall pay any fee or fees
148
charged by another state or its agencies, or any court of
149
competent jurisdiction in this state or any other state, or

SCS SB 836 16
150
the federal government or its agencies, in order to obtain
151
any of the above documents from such state or the federal
152
government.
153
(3) Any applicant who requests a nondriver's license
154
for voti n g shall not be required to pay a fee. The state of
155
Missouri shall pay the legally required fees f o r any such
156
applicant. The department of revenue and a local election
157
authority m ay enter into a contract that allows the local
158
election authority to assist the department in issuing
159
nondriver's license photo identifications.
160
7. The director of the department of revenue shall, by
161
January first of each year, prepare and deliver to each
162
member of the general assembly a report documenting the
163
number of individuals who have requested and received a
164
nondriver's license photo identification for the purposes of
165
voting under this section. The report shall also include
166
the number of persons requ e sting a nondriver's license for
167
purposes of voting under this section, but not receiving
168
such license, and the reason for the denial of the
169
nondriver's license.
170
8. The precinct register shall serve as the voter
171
identif i cation certificate. The following form shall be
172
printed at the top of each p age of the precinct register:
173
VOTER'S IDENTIFICATION CERTIFICATE
174
Warning: It is against the law for anyone to vote,
175
or attempt to vote, without having a lawful right
176
to vote.
177
PRECINCT
178
WARD OR TOWNSHIP ______

SCS SB 836 17
179
GENERAL (SPECIAL, PRIMARY) ELECTION
180
Held ______, 20______
181
Date
182
I hereby certify that I am qualified to vote at
183
this election by signing my name and verifying my
184
address by signing my initials next to my address.
185
9. The secretary of state shall promulgate rules to
186
effectu a te the provisions of this section.
187
10. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
188
defined i n section 536.010, that is created under the
189
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
190
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
191
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
192
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
193
if any o f the powers vested with the general assembly
194
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
195
date or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
196
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
197
any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2002, shall be
198
invalid and void.
199
11. If any voter is unable to sign his name at the
200
appropri a te place on the certificate or computer printout,
201
an election judge or election authority shall print the name
202
and address of the voter in the appropriate place on the
203
precinct register, the voter shall make his mark in lieu of
204
signature, and the voter's mark shall be witnessed by the
205
signature of an election judge or election authority.
1
115.430. 1. This section shall apply to [primary and
2
general elect i ons where candidates for federal or statewide
3
offices are nominated or elected and any election where

SCS SB 836 18
4
statewide issue or issues are submitted to the voters] any
5
public election.
6
2. (1) A voter claiming to be properly registered in
7
the jur i sdic t ion of the election authority and eligible to
8
vote in an election, but whose eligibility at that precinct
9
cannot be immediately established upon examination of the
10
precinct register, shall be entitled to vote a provisional
11
ballot after providing a form of personal identification
12
required pursuant to section 115.427 or upon executing an
13
affidavit under section 115.427, or may vote at a central
14
polling place as established in section 115.115 where the
15
voter may vote his or her appropriate ballot for his or her
16
precinct of residence upon verification of eligibility or
17
vote a provisional ballot if eligibility cannot be
18
determined. The provisional ballot provided to a voter
19
under this s ection shall be the ballot provided to a
20
resident of the voter's precinct determined by reference to
21
the affidavit provided for in this section. If the voter
22
declares that the voter is eligible to vote and the election
23
authority determines that the voter is eligible to vote at
24
another polling place, the voter shall be directed to the
25
correct polling place or a central polling place as
26
established by the election authority pursuant to subsection
27
5 of section 115.115. If the voter refuses to go to the
28
correct polling place or a central polling place, the voter
29
shall be permitted to vote a provisional ballot at the
30
incorrect polling place, but such ballot shall not be
31
counted if the voter was not eligible to vote at that
32
polling place.
33
(2) The following steps shall be taken to establish a
34
voter's e ligibility to vote at a polling place:

SCS SB 836 19
35
(a) The election judge shall examine the precinct
36
register as provided in section 115.425. If the voter is
37
registered and eligible to vote at the p o lling place, the
38
voter shall receive a regular ballot;
39
(b) If the voter's eligibility cannot be immediately
40
establis h ed by examining the precinct register, the election
41
judge shall contact the election authority. If the election
42
authority cannot immediately establish that the voter is
43
registered and eligible to vote at the polling place upon
44
examination of the Missouri voter registration system, or if
45
the election judge is unable to make contact with the
46
election authority immediately, the voter shall be notified
47
that the voter is entitled to a provisional ballot.
48
(3) The voter shall have the duty to appear and vote
49
at the c o rrect polling place. If an election judge
50
determines that the voter is n ot eligible to vote at the
51
polling place at which a voter presents himself or herself,
52
and if the voter appears to be eligible to vote at another
53
polling place, the voter shall be informed that he or she
54
may cast a provisional ballot at the current polling place
55
or may travel to the correct polling place or a central
56
polling place, as established by the election authority
57
under subsection 5 of section 115.115, where the voter may
58
cast a regular ballot or provisional ballot if the voter's
59
eligibility still cannot be determined. Provisional ballots
60
cast at a polling place shall be counted only if the voter
61
was eligible to vote at such polling place as provided in
62
subsection 5 of this section.
63
(4) For a voter requesting an absentee ballot in
64
person, s uch voter shall be entitled to cast a provisional
65
ballot when the voter's eligibility cannot be immediately

SCS SB 836 20
66
established upon examination of the precinct registers or
67
the Missouri voter registration system.
68
(5) Prior to accepting any provisional ballot at the
69
polling p lace, the election judges shall determine that the
70
information provided on the provisional ballot envelope by
71
the provisional voter is consistent with the identification
72
provided by such person under section 115.427.
73
3. (1) No person shall be entitled to receive a
74
provisi o nal b allot until such person has completed a
75
provisional ballot affidavit on the provisional ballot
76
envelope.
77
(2) The secretary of state shall produce appropriate
78
sizes of provisional ballot envelopes and distribute them to
79
each election authority according to their tabulating
80
system. All provisional ballot envelopes shall be printed
81
on a di s tinguishable color of paper that is different from
82
the color of the regular ballot. The provisional ballot
83
envelope shall be in the form re q uired by subsection 4 of
84
this section. All provisional ballots shall be marked with
85
a conspicuous stamp or other distinguishing mark that makes
86
them readily distinguishable from the regular ballots.
87
(3) Once voted, the provisional ballot shall be placed
88
and seal e d in a provisional ballot envelope.
89
4. The provisional ballot in its envelope shall be
90
deposit e d in the ballot box. The provisional ballot
91
envelope shall be completed b y the voter for use in
92
determining eligibility. The provisional ballot envelope
93
specified in this sectio n shall contain a voter's
94
certificate which shall be in substantially the following
95
form:

SCS SB 836 21
96
STATE OF ______
97
COUNTY OF ______
98
I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that my name is
99
______; that my date of birth is ______; that the last
100
four digits of my Social Security Number are ______;
101
that I am registered to vote in ______ County or City
102
(if a City not within a County), Missouri; that I am a
103
qualified voter of said County (or City not within a
104
County); that I am eligible to vote at this polling
105
place; and that I have not voted in this election.
106
I understand that if the above-provided information is
107
not correct and the election authority determines that
108
I am not registered and eligible to vote, my vote
109
will not be counted. I further understand that
110
knowingly providing false information is a violation
111
of law and subjects me to possible criminal
112
prosecution.
113
__________________
114
(Signature of Voter)
115
__________________
116
(Current Address)
117
Subscribed and affirmed before me this ______ day of
118
______, 20______
119
__________________
120
(Signature of Election Official)
121
The voter may provide additional information to further
122
assist the election authority in determining eligibility,
123
including the place and date the voter registered to vote,
124
if known.

SCS SB 836 22
125
5. (1) Prior to counting any provisional ballot, the
126
electio n aut h ority shall determine if the voter is
127
registered and eligible to vote and if the vote was properly
128
cast. The eligibility of provisional votes shall be
129
deter m ined according to the requirements for a voter to cast
130
a ballot in the election as set forth in sections 115.133
131
and 115.135. A provisional [voter] ballot shall not be
132
eligible to b e counted until the election authority has
133
determined that:
134
(a) The voter cast such provisional ballot at a
135
polling p lace established for the voter or the central
136
polling place established by the election authority under
137
subsection 5 of section 115.115;
138
(b) The individual who cast the provisional ballot is
139
an indiv i dual registered to vote in the respective election
140
at the polling place where the ballot was cast;
141
(c) The voter did not otherwise vote in the same
142
election by regular ballot, absentee ballot, or otherwise;
143
and
144
(d) The information on the provisional ballot envelope
145
is found to be correct, complete, and accurate.
146
(2) When the ballot boxes are delivered to the
147
election authority from the polling places, the receiving
148
teams shall separate the provisional ballots from the rest
149
of the ballots and place the sealed provisional ballot
150
envelopes in a separate container. Teams of election
151
authority employees or teams of ele ction judges with each
152
team consisting of one member of each major political party
153
shall photocopy each provisional ballot envelope, such
154
photocopy to be used by the election authority to determine
155
provisional voter eligibility. The sealed provisional

SCS SB 836 23
156
ballot envelopes shall be placed by the team in a sealed
157
container and shall remain therein until tabulation.
158
(3) To determine whether a provisional ballot is valid
159
and enti t led to be counted, the election authority shall
160
examine its records and verify that the provisional voter is
161
properly registered and eligible to vote in the election.
162
If the provisional voter has provided information regardi n g
163
the registration agency where the provisional voter
164
registered to vote, the election authority shall make an
165
inquiry of the registration agency to determine whether the
166
provisional voter is properly registered and eligible to
167
vote in the election.
168
(4) If the election authority determines that the
169
provisio n al voter is registered and eligible to vote in the
170
election, the election authority shall provide documentation
171
verifying the voter's eligibility. Such documentation shall
172
be noted on the copy of the provis i onal ballot envelope and
173
shall contain substantially the following information:
174
(a) The name of the provisional voter;
175
(b) The name of the reviewer;
176
(c) The date and time; and
177
(d) A description of evidence found that supports the
178
voter's e ligibility.
179
(5) The local election authority shall record on a
180
provisio n al ballot acceptance/rejection list the provisional
181
ballot identification number and a notation marking it as
182
accepted.
183
(6) If the election authority determines that the
184
provisio n al voter is not registered or eligible to vote in
185
the election, the election authority shall provide
186
documentation verifying the voter's ineligibility. Such
187
documentation shall be noted on the copy of the pr o visional

SCS SB 836 24
188
ballot envelope and shall contain substantially the
189
following information:
190
(a) The name of the provisional voter;
191
(b) The name of the reviewer;
192
(c) The date and time;
193
(d) A description of why the voter is ineligible.
194
(7) The local election authority shall record on a
195
provisio n al ballot acceptance/rejection list the provisional
196
ballot identification number and notation marking it as
197
rejected.
198
(8) If rejected, a photocopy of the envelope shall be
199
made and used by the election authority as a mail-in voter
200
registration. The actual provisional ballot envelope shall
201
be kept as ba l lot material, and the copy of the envelope
202
shall be used by the election authority for registration
203
record keeping.
204
6. All provisional ballots cast by voters whose
205
eligibi l ity has been verified as provided in this section
206
shall be counted in accordance with the rules governing
207
ballot tabulation. Provisional ballots shall not be counted
208
until all provisio n al ballots are determined either eligible
209
or ineligible and all provisional ballots must be processed
210
before the election is certified. The provisional ballot
211
shall be counted only if the elec t ion authority determines
212
that the voter is registered and eligible to vote.
213
Provisional ballots voted in the wrong polling pla c e shall
214
not be counted. If the voter is not registered but is
215
qualified to re g ister for future elections, the affidavit
216
shall be considered a mail-in application to register to
217
vote pursuant to this chapter.
218
7. (1) After the election authority completes its
219
review o f th e provisional voter's eligibility under

SCS SB 836 25
220
subsection 5 of this section, the election authority shall
221
deliver the provisional ballots and copies of the
222
provisional ballot envelopes that include eligibility
223
information to bipartisan counting teams, which may be the
224
board of verification, for review and tabulation. The
225
election authority shall maintain a record of such
226
delivery. The record shall include the number of ballots
227
delivered to each team and shall include a signed receipt
228
from two judges, one from each major political party. The
229
election authority shall provide each team with a bal l ot box
230
and material necessary for tabulation.
231
(2) If the person named on the provisional ballot
232
affidavi t is found to have been properly qualified and
233
registered to cast a ballot in the election and the
234
provisional ballot otherwise qualifies to be counted under
235
the provisions of this section, the envelope shall be
236
opened, and the ballot shall be placed in a ballot box to be
237
counted.
238
(3) If the person named on the provisional ballot
239
affidavi t is found not to have been properly qualified and
240
registered to cast a ballot in the election or if the
241
election authority is unable to determine such person's
242
right to vote, the envelope containing the provisional
243
ballot shall not be opened, and the person's vote shall not
244
be counted. The members of the team shall follow the
245
procedures s et forth in subsection 5 of this section for
246
rejected provisional ballots.
247
(4) The votes shall be tallied and the returns made as
248
provided in sections 115.447 to 115.525 for paper ballots.
249
After the vote on all ballots assigned to a team have been
250
counted, the ballots, ballot envelopes, and copies of ballot
251
envelopes with the eligibility information provided by the

SCS SB 836 26
252
election authority shall be enclosed in sealed containers
253
marked "Voted provisional ballots and ballot envelopes from
254
the election held ______, 20______". All rejected
255
provisional ballots, ballot envelope s , and copies of ballot
256
envelopes with the eligibility information provided by the
257
election authority shall be enclosed in sealed containers
258
marked "Rejected provisional ballots and ballot envelopes
259
from the election held ______, 20______". On the outside of
260
each voted ballot and rejected ballot con t ainer, each member
261
of the team shall write their name and all such containers
262
shall be returned to the election authority. Upon receipt
263
of the returns and ballots, the election auth ority shall
264
tabulate the provisional votes.
265
8. Challengers and watchers, as provided by sections
266
115.105 and 115.107, may be present during all times that
267
the bipartisan counting teams are reviewing or counting the
268
provisional ballots, the provisional ballot envelopes, or
269
copies of the provisional ballot envelopes that include
270
eligibility information provided by the election authority.
271
Challengers and watchers shall be permitted to observe the
272
determination of the eligibility of all provisional
273
ballots. The election authority shall notify the county
274
chair of each major political party of the time and location
275
when bipartisan counting teams will be reviewing or counting
276
the provisional ballots, the provisional ballot envelopes,
277
or the copies of the provisional ballot envelopes that
278
include the eligibility information provided by the election
279
authority.
280
9. The certificate of ballot cards shall:
281
(1 ) Reflect the number of provisional envelopes
282
delivere d ; and

SCS SB 836 27
283
(2) Reflect the number of sealed provisional envelopes
284
with vot e d ballots deposited in the ballot box.
285
10. In counties where the voting system does not
286
utilize a paper ballot, the election authority shall provide
287
the appropriate provisional ballots to each polling place.
288
11. The secretary of state may promulgate rules for
289
purposes of ensuring the uniform application of this
290
section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant
291
to the a u thority of this section shall become effective
292
unless it has been promulgated pursuant to chapter 536.
293
12. The secretary of state shall design and provide to
294
the elec t ion authorities the envelopes and forms necessary
295
to carry out the provisions of this section.
296
13. Pursuant to the Help America Vote Act of 2002, the
297
secretar y of state shall ensure a free access system is
298
established, such as a toll-free number or an internet
299
website, that any individual who casts a provisional ballot
300
may access to discover whether the vote of that individual
301
was counted, and, if the vote was not counted, the reason
302
that the vote was not counted. At the time an individual
303
casts a provisional ballot, th e election authority shall
304
give the voter written information that states that any
305
individual who casts a provisional ballot will be able to
306
ascertain under such free access system whether the vote was
307
counted, and if the vote was not counted, the reason that
308
the vote was not counted.
309
14. In accordance with the Help America Vote Act of
310
2002, an y individual who votes in an election as a result of
311
a court order or any other order extending the time
312
established for closing the polls in section 115.407 may
313
vote only by using a provisional ballot, and such
314
provisional ballot shall be separated and held apart from

SCS SB 836 28
315
other provisional ballots cast by those not affected by the
316
order. Such ballots shall not be counted until such time as
317
the ba l lots are determined to be valid. No state court
318
shall have jurisdiction to extend the po lling hours
319
established by law, including section 115.407.
1
115.453. Election judges shall count votes for all
2
candidates in the following manner:
3
(1) No candidate shall be counted as voted for, except
4
a candid a te before whose name a distinguishing mark appears
5
preceding the name and a distinguishing mark does not appear
6
in the square preceding the name of any candidate for the
7
same office in another column. Except as provided in this
8
subdivision and subdivision (2 ) of this section, each
9
candidate with a distinguishing mark preceding his or her
10
name shall be counted as voted for;
11
(2) If distinguishing marks appear next to the names
12
of more c andidates for an office than are entitled to fill
13
the office, no candidate for the office shall be counted as
14
voted for. If more than one candidate is to be nominated or
15
elected to an office, and any voter has voted for the same
16
candidate more than once for the same office at the same
17
election, no votes cast by the voter for the candidate shall
18
be counted;
19
(3) No vote shall be counted for any candidate that is
20
not mark e d substantially in accordance with the provisions
21
of this section. The judges shall count votes marked
22
substantially in accordance with this section and section
23
115.456 when the intent of the voter seems clear.
24
Regulations promulgated by the secretary of state shall be
25
used by the judges to determine voter intent. No ballot
26
containing any proper votes shall be rejected for containing
27
fewer marks than are authorized by law;

SCS SB 836 29
28
(4) Write-in votes shall be counted only for
29
candidat e s for election to office who have filed a
30
declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for
31
election to office with the proper election authority, who
32
shall then notify the proper filing officer of the write-in
33
candidate prior to 5:00 p.m. on the second Friday
34
immediately preceding the election day; except that, write-
35
in votes shall be counted only for candidates for election
36
to state or federal office who have filed a declaration of
37
intent to be a write-in candidate for election to state or
38
federal office with the secretary of state pursuant to
39
section 115.353 prior to 5:00 p.m. on the second Friday
40
immediately preceding the election day. No person who filed
41
as a party or independent candidate for nomination or
42
election to an office may, without withdrawing as provided
43
by law, file as a write-in candidate for election to the
44
same office for the same term. No candidate who files for
45
nomination to an office and is not nominated at a primary
46
election may file a declaration of intent to be a write-in
47
candidate for the same office at the general election. When
48
declarations are properly filed with the secretary of s tate,
49
the secretary of state shall promptly transmit copies of all
50
such declarations to the proper election authorities for
51
further action pursuant to this section. The election
52
authority shall furnish a list to the el e ction judges and
53
counting teams prior to election day of all write-in
54
candidates who have filed such declaration. [This
55
subdivision shall not apply to elections wh e rein candidates
56
are being elected to an office for which no candidate has
57
filed.] No person shall file a declaration of intent to be
58
a write - in candidate for election to any municipal office

SCS SB 836 30
59
unless such person is qualified to be certified as a
60
candidate under section 115.306;
61
(5) Write-in votes shall be cast and counted for a
62
candidat e without party designation. Write-in votes for a
63
person cast with a party designation shall not be counted.
64
Except for candidates for political party committees, no
65
candidate shall be elected as a write-in candidate unless
66
such candidate receives a separate plurality of the votes
67
without party designation regardless of whether or not the
68
total write-in votes for such candidate under all party and
69
without party designations totals a majority of the votes
70
cast;
71
(6) When submitted to the election authority, each
72
declarat i on of intent to be a write-in candidate for the
73
office of United States president shall include the name of
74
a candidate for vice president and the name of nominees for
75
presidential elector equal to the number to which the state
76
is entitled. At least one qualified resident of each
77
congressiona l district shall be nominated as presidential
78
elector. Each such declaration of intent to be a write-in
79
candidat e shall be accompanied by a declaration of candidacy
80
for each presidential elector in substantially the form set
81
forth in subsection 3 of section 115.399. Each declaration
82
of candidacy for the office of presidenti a l elector shall be
83
subscribed and sworn to by the candidate before the election
84
official receiving the declaration of intent to be a write-
85
in, notary public or other officer authorized by law to
86
administer oaths.
